New York, session 2025-2026, A9174.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Item (II) of clause (B) of subparagraph (i) and clause (B) 2 of subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (e) of subdivision 1 of section 424-a 3 of the social services law, as amended by section 9 of part R of chapter 4 56 of the laws of 2020, are amended to read as follows: 5 (II) the person is not the subject of an indicated report of child 6 abuse and is the subject of a report of child maltreatment where the 7 indication for child maltreatment occurred within less than [eight] four 8 years from the date of the inquiry. 9 (B) Where the subject of the report is not the subject of any indi- 10 cated report of child abuse and is the subject of a report of child 11 maltreatment where the indication for child maltreatment occurred more 12 than [eight] four years prior to the date of the inquiry, any such indi- 13 cation of child maltreatment shall be deemed to be not relevant and 14 reasonably related to employment. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13830-01-5